Washington statutes.
RCW 18.225.040

Secretary's authority.

In addition to any other authority provided by law, the secretary has the authority to:

(1) Adopt rules under chapter 34.05 RCW necessary to implement this chapter. Any rules adopted shall be in consultation with the committee;

(2) Establish all licensing, examination, and renewal fees in accordance with RCW 43.70.250;

(3) Establish forms and procedures necessary to administer this chapter;

(4) Issue licenses to applicants who have met the education, training, and examination requirements for licensure and to deny a license to applicants who do not meet the requirements;

(5) Hire clerical, administrative, investigative, and other staff as needed to implement this chapter, and hire individuals licensed under this chapter to serve as examiners for any practical examinations;

(6) Administer and supervise the grading and taking of examinations for applicants for licensure;

(7) Determine which states have credentialing requirements substantially equivalent to those of this state, and issue licenses to individuals credentialed in those states without examinations;

(8) Implement and administer a program for consumer education in consultation with the committee;

(9) Adopt rules implementing a continuing education program in consultation with the committee;

(10) The office of crime victims advocacy shall supply the committee with information on methods of recognizing victims of human trafficking, what services are available for these victims, and where to report potential trafficking situations. The information supplied must be culturally sensitive and must include information relating to minor victims. The committee shall disseminate this information to licensees by: Providing the information on the committee's website; including the information in newsletters; holding trainings at meetings attended by organization members; or through another distribution method determined by the committee. The committee shall report to the office of crime victims advocacy on the method or methods it uses to distribute information under this subsection;

(11) Maintain the official record of all applicants and licensees; and

(12) Establish by rule the procedures for an appeal of an examination failure.

[ 2009 c 492 s 7; 2001 c 251 s 4.]